Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
PART 18 Bank Branches, Offices, Facilities, and Holding Companies
7-1-609.
Civil actions by department to enforce part.

The department may bring an appropriate civil action to enforce any provision of this part, whether by injunction or otherwise, in any superior court of this state having jurisdiction of one or more of the defendants.

History.

Code 1933, § 13-208, enacted by Ga. L. 1960, p. 67, § 7; Ga. L. 1970, p. 954, § 6.

7-1-610.
National bank rights.

National banks shall have the same but no greater rights under or by virtue of this part than the rights granted to banks and trust companies organized under the laws of this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1960, p. 67, § 2.

7-1-611.
Penalties for violations.

Any bank, bank holding company, or company (as defined in Code Section 7-1-605) which violates subsection (a) of Code Section 7-1-601 or any provision of Code Section 7-1-602, Code Section 7-1-603, or Code Sections 7-1-605 through 7-1-608 shall be subject to civil monetary penalties of not less than $500.00 nor more than $5,000.00 unless it shall cease and desist therefrom within 60 days after notice of any such violation served on it by the department. Each day on which such violation occurs shall constitute a separate offense.

History.

Code 1933, § 13-9938, enacted by Ga. L. 1960, p. 67, § 8; Ga. L. 2000, p. 136, § 7; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 7-14/HB 811.

7-1-612.
Power of banks to contract with other banks for trust services.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this part to the contrary, any bank or trust company which does not exercise trust powers as provided in this chapter, whether or not such powers have been incorporated into its articles, may, with the consent of the department, contract with any bank or trust company exercising trust powers to provide for the latter bank or trust company to offer trust services through the branches and offices of the former bank or trust company.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-612

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 602, § 16; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1244, § 2.